Hawaii statutes.
[§46-15.36] Hospice homes; permitted use in
residential areas. For purposes of section 46-4, a hospice home shall be
considered a residential use of property and shall be a permitted use in
residentially designated zones including but not limited to zones for
single-family dwellings. No conditional use, permit, variance, or special
exception shall be required for a residence used as a hospice home.

For purposes of this section, "hospice
home" means any facility operated by a licensed hospice service agency
providing twenty-four-hour living accommodations to no more than five unrelated
persons who are admitted to the hospice program of care. [L 1999, c 77, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next